Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-509
Secretary of State; deputy; compensation.

The deputy secretary of state shall receive a salary of such amount as shall be fixed by the Secretary of State, to be paid monthly by warrant of the Director of Administrative Services on the State Treasurer.

Laws 1877, § 8, p. 199;

Laws 1909, c. 124, § 1, p. 465;

R.S.1913, § 5575;

Laws 1921, c. 107, § 6, p. 380;

C.S.1922, § 4879;

C.S.1929, § 84-507;

R.S.1943, § 84-509;

Laws 1945, c. 254, § 2, p. 793;

Laws 1947, c. 347, § 2, p. 1093;

Laws 1951, c. 338, § 10, p. 1120;

Laws 1955, c. 349, § 1, p. 1068;

Laws 1957, c. 396, § 1, p. 1361;

Laws 1959, c. 451, § 3, p. 1504;

Laws 1963, c. 536, § 2, p. 1682.